Utah statutes.
62A-5-302.   Division responsibility.

The division is responsible:

(1)  for the supervision, care, and treatment of persons with an intellectual disability in this state who are committed to the division's jurisdiction under the provisions of this part; and

(2)  to evaluate and determine the most appropriate, least restrictive setting for an individual with an intellectual disability.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

